Washington statutes.
RCW 11.130.110

Liability of guardian or conservator for act of individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship.

A guardian or conservator is not personally liable to another person solely because of the guardianship or conservatorship for an act or omission of the individual subject to guardianship or conservatorship.

[ 2019 c 437 s 122.]